Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1303.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4574. Heat detection devices in emergency vehicles.(a) Heat detection device.--An emergency vehicle transporting a K-9 officer shall be equipped with a heat detection device.(b) Minimum requirements.--A heat detection device installed in an emergency vehicle transporting a K-9 officer shall, at a minimum:(1) alert the vehicle operator that the vehicle has a cabin temperature that is unsafe for the K-9 officer by utilizing the horn, sirens and lights; and1234567891011121314151617 (2) automatically roll down two windows when the vehicle reaches an unsafe cabin temperature.(c) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations governing the type, function, installation, temperature limits and use of heat detection devices, taking into consideration different requirements for different classes or types of vehicles. The department shall have the authority to regulate the performance of heat detection devices on a vehicle.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Heat detection device." An apparatus that measures the temperature inside a vehicle passenger space, alerts the vehicle operator of an unsafe temperature inside the vehicle and activates the vehicle's electromechanical systems in order to cool the vehicle to a safe temperature."K-9 officer." A dog used by the Pennsylvania State Police, a police department established by a metropolitan transportation authority operating under 74 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities), a police department established by a port authority established under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act, the Capitol Police, the Department of Corrections, a county facility or office or a municipal police department, fire department, search and rescue unit or agency or handler under the supervision of the department, search and rescue unit or agency in the performance of the functions or duties of the department, search and rescue unit or agency, whether the animal is on duty or not on duty. The term includes an accelerant detection dog, bomb detection dog, narcotic 20250HB1303PN1497 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detection dog, search and rescue dog and tracking animal.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1303PN1497 - 3 - 12